Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Waterway Marina Development

154.80-310.
Kentucky Waterway Marina Development Program — Powers of cabinet.

There is created within the cabinet a Kentucky Waterway Marina Development Program. The cabinet shall study various plans and recommendations that are proposed concerning marina development along Kentucky navigable waterways. Based on these studies, the cabinet shall formulate a comprehensive plan, recommend state and local legislation for the development of marinas, and coordinate the implementation of the plan and legislation. The cabinet may make grants of money to units of local government for the construction or improvement of any marina, if the grants are consistent with the plans, standards, and criteria established by the cabinet.

If necessary to further the accomplishment of its purposes, the cabinet may do the following:

Conduct all studies necessary for the performance of its duties;

Publicize, advertise, and distribute reports on its purposes, objectives and findings;

Provide recommendations in matters related to its functions and objectives to political subdivisions in and adjacent to the waterway corridor and to other public and private agencies;

If requested, act as a coordinating agency for programs and activities of other public and private organizations that are related to its objectives;

Acquire and dispose of real or personal property by grant, gift, purchase, lease, devise, or otherwise; and

Hold, use, improve, maintain, operate, own, manage, or lease, as lessor or lessee, real or personal property, or any interest in that property.

The cabinet may receive grants and appropriations from federal, state, and local governments, individuals, foundations, and other organizations. The cabinet may enter into agreements or contracts regarding the acceptance or use of these grants and appropriations for the purpose of carrying out its activities under this section.

The goal for any marina project under this section shall be to create employment in the private sector.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 391, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 105, § 40, effective July 14, 1992.